Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.17
Local governing body, defined.

Local governing body means
(1) the city council or village board of trustees of a city or village within
which the licensed premises are located or (2) if the licensed premises are
not within the corporate limits of a city or village, the county board of
the county within which the licensed premises are located.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 25.